apertium-chv.chv.lexc
LEXICON N-YĔP
! Special case for йӗп, хутаҫ, йывăҫ (Виноградовăн 2002 орфографи словарӗ)

                                                               N ;
%<n%>%<px3sp%>:%{ː%}%>%{и%}%{н%}                               PLURAL "weight: 1.0" ; ! йӗппи ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-KUKĂL
! Special word with two possible px3sp forms

:ăль                                                           N-SUPĂN ;
%<n%>%<px3sp%>:ла%>%{и%}%{н%}                                  PLURAL "weight: 1.0";

LEXICON N-ÇAŞĂK
! Special word with three possible px3sp forms (source: Fedorynqyk)

:ăк                                                           N-SUPĂN ;
%<n%>%<px3sp%>:ăк%{ː%}ӑ%>%{и%}%{н%}                           PLURAL "weight: 1.0";
%<n%>%<px3sp%>:ка%>%{и%}%{н%}                                 PLURAL "weight: 1.0";


LEXICON POSS-ANNE 

:нне                                                           PLURAL ;
%<px1sg%>:нн%>ем                                               PLURAL ;
%<px2sg%>:нн%{ь%}%>%{U%}%{н%}                                  PLURAL ;
%<px3sp%>:мӑш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                      PLURAL ;
%<px1pl%>:нне%>м%{Ă%}р                                         PLURAL ;
%<px2pl%>:нн%>ӗр                                               PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-ATTE 

:тте                                                           PLURAL ;
%<px1sg%>:тт%>ем                                               PLURAL ;
%<px2sg%>:ҫ%>%{U%}%{н%}                                        PLURAL ;
%<px3sp%>:шш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;
%<px1pl%>:тте%>м%{Ă%}р                                         PLURAL ;
%<px2pl%>:ҫ%>ӑр                                                PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-ATTEANNE

:тте-анне                                                      PLURAL ;
%<px1sg%>:тте-анн%>ем                                          PLURAL ;
%<px2sg%>:ҫу-анн%{ь%}%>%{U%}%{н%}                              PLURAL ;
%<px3sp%>:шӗ-амӑш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                  PLURAL ;
%<px1pl%>:тте-анне%>м%{Ă%}р                                    PLURAL ;
%<px2pl%>:ҫӑр-анн%>ӗр                                          PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-HUNYAMA 

:а                                                             PLURAL ;
:а                                                             POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:ӑш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-HUNYAÇA 

:ҫа                                                            PLURAL ;
:ҫа                                                            POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:шш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-KUKAMAY 

:ай                                                            PLURAL ;
:ай                                                            POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:ӑш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-KUKAÇI 

:ҫи%{й%}                                                       PLURAL ;
:ҫи%{й%}                                                       POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:шш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-PIÇÇE 
! Exactly like POSS-HUNYAMA, but with final e

:е                                                             PLURAL ;
:е                                                             POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:ӗш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-ASANNE 

:анне                                                           PLURAL ;
:анне                                                           POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:ламӑш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                     PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-ASATTE 

:атте                                                           PLURAL ;
%<px1sg%>:атте%>%{ă%}м                                          PLURAL ;
%<px2sg%>:лаҫ%>%{U%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;
%<px3sp%>:лашш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                      PLURAL ;
%<px1pl%>:атте%>%{ă%}м%{Ă%}р                                    PLURAL ;
%<px2pl%>:атте%>%{Ĕ%}р                                          PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-HERESNANNE 

:нне                                                           PLURAL ;
:нне                                                           POSS-P1X-P2X ;
%<px3sp%>:мамӑш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                    PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSS-HERESNATTE 

:тте                                                           PLURAL ;
%<px1sg%>:тте%>%{ă%}м                                          PLURAL ;
%<px2sg%>:ҫ%>%{U%}%{н%}                                        PLURAL ;
%<px3sp%>:шш%>%{и%}%{н%}                                       PLURAL ;
%<px1pl%>:тте%>%{ă%}м%{Ă%}р                                    PLURAL ;
%<px2pl%>:тте%>%{Ĕ%}р                                          PLURAL ;

LEXICON N-ANNE 
! Special lexicon for the word "анне", irregular possessive forms

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-ANNE ; 

LEXICON N-ATTE 
! Special lexicon for the word "атте", irregular possessive forms

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-ATTE ; 

LEXICON N-ATTEANNE
! Special lexicon for the word "атте-анне", irregular possessive forms

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-ATTEANNE ; 


LEXICON N-HUNYAMA
! Special lexicon for the words "хуняма" and "аппа", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-HUNYAMA ; 


LEXICON N-HUNYAÇA
! Special lexicon for the word "хуняҫа", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-HUNYAÇA ; 

LEXICON N-KUKAMAY
! Special lexicon for the word "кукамай", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-KUKAMAY ; 

LEXICON N-KUKAÇI
! Special lexicon for the word "кукаҫи", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-KUKAÇI ; 

LEXICON N-PIÇÇE
! Special lexicon for the word "пичче", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-PIÇÇE ; 

LEXICON N-ASANNE
! Special lexicon for the word "aсанне", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-ASANNE ; 

LEXICON N-ASATTE
! Special lexicon for the word "aсатте", irregular possessive forms

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-ASATTE ; 

LEXICON N-HERESNANNE
! Special lexicon for the word "aсанне", irregular px3sp form

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-HERESNANNE ; 

LEXICON N-HERESNATTE
! Special lexicon for the word "aсатте", irregular possessive forms

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-HERESNATTE ; 


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON IJ
! Interjection / междометие

%<ij%>:                                                        #;

LEXICON DET-QNT
! Quantifier determiners,  
%<det%>%<qnt%>:                                                # ;

LEXICON DET-IND
! Indefinite determiners,  
%<det%>%<ind%>:                                                # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM
! Demonstrative determiners, напр. *Ку* кӗнекене.
%<det%>%<dem%>:                                                # ;

LEXICON NUM-ORD

%<ord%>:                                                       # ;
%<ord%>%<subst%>:                                              NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

                                                               CASE ;
LEXICON NUM-DIST

                                                               CASE ;
LEXICON NUM-ROMAN 
! Roman numerals, напр. "VI" (улттӑмĕш)

%<num%>%<ord%>:                                                # ; 

LEXICON Nouns 
анне:а                               N-ANNE ;     ! "мать"
атте:а                               N-ATTE ;     ! "отец"
атте-анне:а                          N-ATTEANNE ; ! "родители"
хуняма:хуням                         N-HUNYAMA ;  ! "тёща, свекровь"
хуняҫа:хуня                          N-HUNYAÇA ;  ! "свёкор"
аппа:апп                             N-HUNYAMA ;  ! "старшая сестра"
кукамай:кукам                        N-KUKAMAY ;  ! "бабушка от матери"
кукаҫи:кука                          N-KUKAÇI ;   ! "дедушка от матери"
асанне:ас                            N-ASANNE ;   ! "бабушка по отцу"
асатте:ас                            N-ASATTE ;   ! "дедушка по отцу"
хӗреснанне:хӗресна                   N-HERESNANNE; ! "крестная мать"
хреснанне:хӗресна                    N-HERESNANNE; ! "крестная мать"	! Dir/LR
хӗреснатте:хӗресна                   N-HERESNATTE; ! "крестный отец"
хреснатте:хӗресна                    N-HERESNATTE; ! "крестный отец"	! Dir/LR
пичче:пичч                           N-PIÇÇE ;    ! "старший брат"
йӗп:йӗп                         N-YĔP ;          ! ""
кашӑк-чашӑк:кашӑк-чаш            N-ÇAŞĂK ;!"посуда"
кукӑль:кук            N-KUKĂL;!""
хутаҫ:хутаҫ            N-YĔP;!""
йывӑҫ:йывӑҫ            N-YĔP;!""
чашӑк:чаш            N-ÇAŞĂK;!""
тирӗк-чашӑк:тирӗк-чаш N-ÇAŞĂK; ! "общее название столовой посуды"
LEXICON Proper 
салам:салам IJ ; ! ""
тавтапуҫ:тавтапуҫ IJ ; ! ""
тав:тав IJ ; ! ""
тавах:тавах IJ ; ! ""
э-те-те:э-те-те IJ ; ! ""
LEXICON Numerals
I:I NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
